Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
199D]

CIVIL
NATURAL RESOURCE VIOLATIONS ACT

Section

199D-1 Civil natural resource violations system
authorization

199D-2 Applicability

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next